South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3386.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 7, Chapter 13, Title 7 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 7-13-870.  (A) As used in this section, "instant runoff voting" and "ranked choice voting" mean a method of casting and tabulating votes in which: (a) voters rank candidates in order of preference; (b) tabulation proceeds in rounds such that in each round either a candidate or candidates are elected or the last-place candidate is defeated; (c) votes are transferred from elected or defeated candidates to the voters' next-ranked candidate or candidates in order of preference; and (d) tabulation ends when a candidate receives the majority of votes cast or the number of candidates elected equals the number of offices to be filled, as applicable. (B) A county election board of voter registration and elections or a municipal election commission shall not utilize instant runoff voting or ranked choice voting to conduct a general, special, or primary election for any federal, state, or local office. (C) Nothing in this section may be construed to prohibit the conduct of at-large or multimember district elections in municipal and other local elections as otherwise permitted by law. (D) Nothing in this section may be construed to prohibit a covered voter under the provisions of the South Carolina Uniform Military and Overseas Voter Act from casting an absentee instant runoff ballot as provided in Section 7-15-650. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----